Utah statutes.
63G-2-308.   Segregation of records.
Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, if a governmental entity
receives a request for access to a record  that contains both information that
the requester is entitled to inspect and information that the requester is not
entitled to inspect under this chapter, and, if the information the requester
is entitled to inspect is intelligible, the governmental entity:
(1)  shall allow access to information in the record that the requester is
entitled to inspect under this chapter; and
(2)  may deny access to information in the record if the information is exempt
from disclosure to the requester, issuing a notice of denial as provided in
Section 63G-2-205.
